Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.175

Action against state patrol officers in private law enforcement off-duty employment—Immunity of state—Notice to employer.

(1) The state of Washington is not liable for tortious conduct by Washington state patrol officers that occurs while such officers are engaged in private law enforcement off-duty employment.

(2) Upon petition of the state any suit, for which immunity is granted to the state under subsection (1) of this section, shall be dismissed.

(3) Washington state patrol officers engaged in private law enforcement off-duty employment shall notify, in writing, prior to such employment, anyone who employs Washington state patrol officers in private off-duty employment of the specific provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

[ 1997 c 375 s 2.]